Utah statutes.
58-78-303.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1)  The division shall issue each license under this chapter in accordance with an annual renewal cycle established by rule.

(2)  Each license automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless renewed by the licensee in accordance with Section 58-1-308.

(3)  Each person holding a license under this chapter as a vocational rehabilitation counselor shall complete in each period of licensure a program of qualifying continuing professional education in accordance with standards defined by rule.

